Tennessee, session 114, HB2259.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-272(b), is amended by adding
the following as new, appropriately designated subdivisions:
( ) "Adverse healthcare incident" means an objective and definable outcome
arising from or related to patient care that results in the death or physical injury of a
patient;
( ) "Open discussion":
(A) Means any communication that is made under this section and
includes memoranda, work product, documents, and other materials that are
prepared for, or submitted in the course of or in connection with, communications
under this section; and
(B) Does not include any communications, memoranda, work product,
documents, or other materials that are otherwise subject to discovery and that
were not prepared specifically for use pursuant to this subdivision (b)( );
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-272(c), is amended by adding
the following as new subdivisions:
(4) A good faith disclosure of information related to an activity of a QIC made by
a healthcare provider or healthcare organization to a patient or family member of a
patient is not a waiver of the privilege and confidentiality protections provided under this
HB2259
012689
- 1 -

section. Such disclosures are considered separate from a QIC proceeding and do not
affect the privilege attributed to the QIC documentation.
(5) A healthcare provider and healthcare organization are not required to
disclose findings, determinations, or conclusions of a QIC during a legal, administrative,
or other proceeding. Participation in or the outcomes from the QIC review must remain
confidential and privileged unless otherwise mandated by federal law.
(6)
(1) A healthcare provider or healthcare organization may voluntarily
engage in open, post-adverse healthcare incident communications with a patient
or the patient's family regarding the incident. Such communications are not an
admission of liability and are protected from discovery, as described in
subdivision (c)(1).
(2) A healthcare provider or healthcare organization engaging in
voluntary communications as described in subdivision (c)(6), is immune from
liability for the contents of the communication, as long as the communication is
undertaken in good faith.
(7)
(A) If an adverse healthcare incident occurs, then a healthcare provider
or healthcare organization may elect to engage in an open discussion with a
patient or invite a patient to participate in the open discussion with the purpose of
addressing the incident and proposing resolutions. In a situation where the
patient is incapacitated or deceased, a healthcare provider or a healthcare
organization may engage in an open discussion with a patient's family member or
legal representative. For a minor patient, the open discussion must include the
patient's guardian.
- 2 - 012689

(B) The following conditions apply to an open discussion pursuant to
subdivision (c)(7)(A):
(i) Any communication made during the open discussion process
is:
(a) Privileged and confidential;
(b) Not subject to discovery, subpoena, or use as
evidence in any judicial, administrative, or arbitration proceeding;
and
(c) Encouraged to include offers of settlement or
corrective actions without implying fault or liability;
(ii) An individual with whom a healthcare provider or healthcare
organization engages in the open discussion process following an
adverse healthcare incident, including a patient and any other affected
person, must be advised of the patient's right to legal counsel before
participating in the open discussion;
(iii) The healthcare provider or healthcare organization shall notify
an individual with whom such provider or organization attempts to engage
in an open discussion with in writing that participation in an open
discussion does not extend a statute of limitation for filing a lawsuit unless
agreed to in writing by each party; and
(iv) Unless otherwise agreed upon by the patient, only a party
involved in the adverse healthcare incident and the party's
representatives, including legal counsel, may participate in the open
discussion process.
(8)
- 3 - 012689

(A) A party wishing to waive confidentiality on open discussion materials
must provide an express waiver in writing. The waiver must clearly identify the
materials involved and specify the scope of the waiver.
(B) The waiver must include:
(i) A list of the specific materials covered by the waiver;
(ii) A statement of the purpose for waiving confidentiality;
(iii) An acknowledgment of the waiver's implications; and
(iv) The duration of the waiver, if applicable.
(C) The waiver must be signed and dated by an authorized
representative. An authorized representative may utilize an electronic signature.
(D) The waiver may be revoked at any time through written notice, and
such revocation becomes effective upon receipt, except where the waiver has
been relied upon for a material action.
(E) This requirement does not apply when disclosures are mandated by
law or court order.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 012689